Utah statutes.
19-6-417.   Use of fund revenues to investigate certain releases from petroleum storage tank.

If the director is notified of or otherwise becomes aware of a release or suspected release of petroleum, he may expend revenues from the fund to investigate the release or suspected release if he has reasonable cause to believe the release is from a tank that is covered by the fund.

